Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Chapter 7 Administration of Estates

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

31 Am. Jur. 2d Executors and Administrators § 1 et seq.

Modern status of jurisdiction of federal courts, under 28 U.S.C. § 1332(a), of diversity actions affecting probate or other matters concerning administration of decedents' estates, 61 ALR Fed 536.